Illinois, session 104th, HB77.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Illinois Controlled Substances Act is 5amended by changing Section 208 and by by adding Section 309.1 6as follows: 7    (720 ILCS 570/208)  (from Ch. 56 1/2, par. 1208)8    (Text of Section before amendment by P.A. 103-881)9    Sec. 208. (a) The controlled substances listed in this 10Section are included in Schedule III.11    (b) Unless specifically excepted or unless listed in 12another schedule, any material, compound, mixture, or 13preparation which contains any quantity of the following 14substances having a stimulant effect on the central nervous 15system, including its salts, isomers (whether optical 16position, or geometric), and salts of such isomers whenever 17the existence of such salts, isomers, and salts of isomers is 18possible within the specific chemical designation;19        (1) Those compounds, mixtures, or preparations in 20    dosage unit form containing any stimulant substances 21    listed in Schedule II which compounds, mixtures, or 22    preparations were listed on August 25, 1971, as excepted 23    compounds under Title 21, Code of Federal Regulations,   HB0077- 2 -LRB104 03201 RLC 13222 b1    Section 308.32, and any other drug of the quantitative 2    composition shown in that list for those drugs or which is 3    the same except that it contains a lesser quantity of 4    controlled substances;5        (2) Benzphetamine;6        (3) Chlorphentermine;7        (4) Clortermine;8        (5) Phendimetrazine.9    (c) Unless specifically excepted or unless listed in 10another schedule, any material, compound, mixture, or 11preparation which contains any quantity of the following 12substances having a potential for abuse associated with a 13depressant effect on the central nervous system:14        (1) Any compound, mixture, or preparation containing 15    amobarbital, secobarbital, pentobarbital or any salt 16    thereof and one or more other active medicinal ingredients 17    which are not listed in any schedule;18        (2) Any suppository dosage form containing 19    amobarbital, secobarbital, pentobarbital or any salt of 20    any of these drugs and approved by the Federal Food and 21    Drug Administration for marketing only as a suppository;22        (3) Any substance which contains any quantity of a 23    derivative of barbituric acid, or any salt thereof:24        (3.1) Aprobarbital;25        (3.2) Butabarbital (secbutabarbital);26        (3.3) Butalbital;  HB0077- 3 -LRB104 03201 RLC 13222 b1        (3.4) Butobarbital (butethal); 2        (4) Chlorhexadol;3        (5) Methyprylon;4        (6) Sulfondiethylmethane;5        (7) Sulfonethylmethane;6        (8) Sulfonmethane;7        (9) Lysergic acid;8        (10) Lysergic acid amide;9        (10.1) Tiletamine or zolazepam or both, or any salt of 10    either of them.11    Some trade or other names for a tiletamine-zolazepam 12    combination product: Telazol. 13    Some trade or other names for Tiletamine: 14    2-(ethylamino)-2-(2-thienyl)-cyclohexanone. 15    Some trade or other names for zolazepam: 16    4-(2-fluorophenyl)-6,8-dihydro-1,3,8-trimethylpyrazolo- 17    [3,4-e], [1,4]-diazepin-7(1H)-one, and flupyrazapon.18        (11) Any material, compound, mixture or preparation 19    containing not more than 12.5 milligrams of pentazocine or 20    any of its salts, per 325 milligrams of aspirin;21        (12) Any material, compound, mixture or preparation 22    containing not more than 12.5 milligrams of pentazocine or 23    any of its salts, per 325 milligrams of acetaminophen;24        (13) Any material, compound, mixture or preparation 25    containing not more than 50 milligrams of pentazocine or 26    any of its salts plus naloxone HCl USP 0.5 milligrams, per   HB0077- 4 -LRB104 03201 RLC 13222 b1    dosage unit;2        (14) Ketamine;3        (15) Thiopental. 4    (d) Nalorphine.5    (d.5) Buprenorphine. 6    (e) Unless specifically excepted or unless listed in 7another schedule, any material, compound, mixture, or 8preparation containing limited quantities of any of the 9following narcotic drugs, or their salts calculated as the 10free anhydrous base or alkaloid, as set forth below:11        (1) not more than 1.8 grams of codeine per 100 12    milliliters or not more than 90 milligrams per dosage 13    unit, with an equal or greater quantity of an isoquinoline 14    alkaloid of opium;15        (2) not more than 1.8 grams of codeine per 100 16    milliliters or not more than 90 milligrams per dosage 17    unit, with one or more active non-narcotic ingredients in 18    recognized therapeutic amounts;19        (3) (blank);20        (4) (blank);21        (5) not more than 1.8 grams of dihydrocodeine per 100 22    milliliters or not more than 90 milligrams per dosage 23    unit, with one or more active, non-narcotic ingredients in 24    recognized therapeutic amounts;25        (6) not more than 300 milligrams of ethylmorphine per 26    100 milliliters or not more than 15 milligrams per dosage   HB0077- 5 -LRB104 03201 RLC 13222 b1    unit, with one or more active, non-narcotic ingredients in 2    recognized therapeutic amounts;3        (7) not more than 500 milligrams of opium per 100 4    milliliters or per 100 grams, or not more than 25 5    milligrams per dosage unit, with one or more active, 6    non-narcotic ingredients in recognized therapeutic 7    amounts;8        (8) not more than 50 milligrams of morphine per 100 9    milliliters or per 100 grams with one or more active, 10    non-narcotic ingredients in recognized therapeutic 11    amounts.12    (f) Anabolic steroids, except the following anabolic 13steroids that are exempt:14        (1) Androgyn L.A.;15        (2) Andro-Estro 90-4;16        (3) depANDROGYN;17        (4) DEPO-T.E.;18        (5) depTESTROGEN;19        (6) Duomone;20        (7) DURATESTRIN;21        (8) DUO-SPAN II;22        (9) Estratest;23        (10) Estratest H.S.;24        (11) PAN ESTRA TEST;25        (12) Premarin with Methyltestosterone;26        (13) TEST-ESTRO Cypionates;  HB0077- 6 -LRB104 03201 RLC 13222 b1        (14) Testosterone Cyp 50 Estradiol Cyp 2;2        (15) Testosterone Cypionate-Estradiol Cypionate 3    injection; and4        (16) Testosterone Enanthate-Estradiol Valerate 5    injection.6    (g) Hallucinogenic substances.7        (1) Dronabinol (synthetic) in sesame oil and 8    encapsulated in a soft gelatin capsule in a U.S. Food and 9    Drug Administration approved product. Some other names for 10    dronabinol: (6aR-trans)-6a,7,8,10a-tetrahydro- 11    6,6,9-trimethyl-3-pentyl-6H-dibenzo (b,d) pyran-1-ol) or 12    (-)-delta-9-(trans)-tetrahydrocannabinol.13        (2) (Reserved).14    (h) The Department may except by rule any compound, 15mixture, or preparation containing any stimulant or depressant 16substance listed in subsection (b) from the application of all 17or any part of this Act if the compound, mixture, or 18preparation contains one or more active medicinal ingredients 19not having a stimulant or depressant effect on the central 20nervous system, and if the admixtures are included therein in 21combinations, quantity, proportion, or concentration that 22vitiate the potential for abuse of the substances which have a 23stimulant or depressant effect on the central nervous system.24(Source: P.A. 100-368, eff. 1-1-18.) 25    (Text of Section after amendment by P.A. 103-881)  HB0077- 7 -LRB104 03201 RLC 13222 b1    Sec. 208. (a) The controlled substances listed in this 2Section are included in Schedule III.3    (b) Unless specifically excepted or unless listed in 4another schedule, any material, compound, mixture, or 5preparation which contains any quantity of the following 6substances having a stimulant effect on the central nervous 7system, including its salts, isomers (whether optical 8position, or geometric), and salts of such isomers whenever 9the existence of such salts, isomers, and salts of isomers is 10possible within the specific chemical designation;11        (1) Those compounds, mixtures, or preparations in 12    dosage unit form containing any stimulant substances 13    listed in Schedule II which compounds, mixtures, or 14    preparations were listed on August 25, 1971, as excepted 15    compounds under Title 21, Code of Federal Regulations, 16    Section 308.32, and any other drug of the quantitative 17    composition shown in that list for those drugs or which is 18    the same except that it contains a lesser quantity of 19    controlled substances;20        (2) Benzphetamine;21        (3) Chlorphentermine;22        (4) Clortermine;23        (5) Phendimetrazine.24    (c) Unless specifically excepted or unless listed in 25another schedule, any material, compound, mixture, or 26preparation which contains any quantity of the following   HB0077- 8 -LRB104 03201 RLC 13222 b1substances having a potential for misuse associated with a 2depressant effect on the central nervous system:3        (1) Any compound, mixture, or preparation containing 4    amobarbital, secobarbital, pentobarbital or any salt 5    thereof and one or more other active medicinal ingredients 6    which are not listed in any schedule;7        (2) Any suppository dosage form containing 8    amobarbital, secobarbital, pentobarbital or any salt of 9    any of these drugs and approved by the Federal Food and 10    Drug Administration for marketing only as a suppository;11        (3) Any substance which contains any quantity of a 12    derivative of barbituric acid, or any salt thereof:13        (3.1) Aprobarbital;14        (3.2) Butabarbital (secbutabarbital);15        (3.3) Butalbital;16        (3.4) Butobarbital (butethal); 17        (4) Chlorhexadol;18        (5) Methyprylon;19        (6) Sulfondiethylmethane;20        (7) Sulfonethylmethane;21        (8) Sulfonmethane;22        (9) Lysergic acid;23        (10) Lysergic acid amide;24        (10.1) Tiletamine or zolazepam or both, or any salt of 25    either of them.26    Some trade or other names for a tiletamine-zolazepam HB0077- 9 -LRB104 03201 RLC 13222 b1    combination product: Telazol. 2    Some trade or other names for Tiletamine: 3    2-(ethylamino)-2-(2-thienyl)-cyclohexanone. 4    Some trade or other names for zolazepam: 5    4-(2-fluorophenyl)-6,8-dihydro-1,3,8-trimethylpyrazolo- 6    [3,4-e], [1,4]-diazepin-7(1H)-one, and flupyrazapon.7        (11) Any material, compound, mixture or preparation 8    containing not more than 12.5 milligrams of pentazocine or 9    any of its salts, per 325 milligrams of aspirin;10        (12) Any material, compound, mixture or preparation 11    containing not more than 12.5 milligrams of pentazocine or 12    any of its salts, per 325 milligrams of acetaminophen;13        (13) Any material, compound, mixture or preparation 14    containing not more than 50 milligrams of pentazocine or 15    any of its salts plus naloxone HCl USP 0.5 milligrams, per 16    dosage unit;17        (14) Ketamine;18        (15) Thiopental; . 19        (16) dihydro-4H-1,3 thiazin-2-amine), including its 20    isomers, esters, ethers, salts, and salts of isomers, 21    esters, and ethers, whenever the existence of such 22    isomers, esters, ethers, and salts is possible within the 23    specific chemical designation. 24    (d) Nalorphine.25    (d.5) Buprenorphine. 26    (e) Unless specifically excepted or unless listed in   HB0077- 10 -LRB104 03201 RLC 13222 b1another schedule, any material, compound, mixture, or 2preparation containing limited quantities of any of the 3following narcotic drugs, or their salts calculated as the 4free anhydrous base or alkaloid, as set forth below:5        (1) not more than 1.8 grams of codeine per 100 6    milliliters or not more than 90 milligrams per dosage 7    unit, with an equal or greater quantity of an isoquinoline 8    alkaloid of opium;9        (2) not more than 1.8 grams of codeine per 100 10    milliliters or not more than 90 milligrams per dosage 11    unit, with one or more active non-narcotic ingredients in 12    recognized therapeutic amounts;13        (3) (blank);14        (4) (blank);15        (5) not more than 1.8 grams of dihydrocodeine per 100 16    milliliters or not more than 90 milligrams per dosage 17    unit, with one or more active, non-narcotic ingredients in 18    recognized therapeutic amounts;19        (6) not more than 300 milligrams of ethylmorphine per 20    100 milliliters or not more than 15 milligrams per dosage 21    unit, with one or more active, non-narcotic ingredients in 22    recognized therapeutic amounts;23        (7) not more than 500 milligrams of opium per 100 24    milliliters or per 100 grams, or not more than 25 25    milligrams per dosage unit, with one or more active, 26    non-narcotic ingredients in recognized therapeutic   HB0077- 11 -LRB104 03201 RLC 13222 b1    amounts;2        (8) not more than 50 milligrams of morphine per 100 3    milliliters or per 100 grams with one or more active, 4    non-narcotic ingredients in recognized therapeutic 5    amounts.6    (f) Anabolic steroids, except the following anabolic 7steroids that are exempt:8        (1) Androgyn L.A.;9        (2) Andro-Estro 90-4;10        (3) depANDROGYN;11        (4) DEPO-T.E.;12        (5) depTESTROGEN;13        (6) Duomone;14        (7) DURATESTRIN;15        (8) DUO-SPAN II;16        (9) Estratest;17        (10) Estratest H.S.;18        (11) PAN ESTRA TEST;19        (12) Premarin with Methyltestosterone;20        (13) TEST-ESTRO Cypionates;21        (14) Testosterone Cyp 50 Estradiol Cyp 2;22        (15) Testosterone Cypionate-Estradiol Cypionate 23    injection; and24        (16) Testosterone Enanthate-Estradiol Valerate 25    injection.26    (g) Hallucinogenic substances.  HB0077- 12 -LRB104 03201 RLC 13222 b1        (1) Dronabinol (synthetic) in sesame oil and 2    encapsulated in a soft gelatin capsule in a U.S. Food and 3    Drug Administration approved product. Some other names for 4    dronabinol: (6aR-trans)-6a,7,8,10a-tetrahydro- 5    6,6,9-trimethyl-3-pentyl-6H-dibenzo (b,d) pyran-1-ol) or 6    (-)-delta-9-(trans)-tetrahydrocannabinol.7        (2) (Reserved).8    (h) The Department may except by rule any compound, 9mixture, or preparation containing any stimulant or depressant 10substance listed in subsection (b) from the application of all 11or any part of this Act if the compound, mixture, or 12preparation contains one or more active medicinal ingredients 13not having a stimulant or depressant effect on the central 14nervous system, and if the admixtures are included therein in 15combinations, quantity, proportion, or concentration that 16vitiate the potential for misuse of the substances which have 17a stimulant or depressant effect on the central nervous 18system.19(Source: P.A. 103-881, eff. 1-1-25.) 20    (720 ILCS 570/309.1 new)21    Sec. 309.1. Xylazine exemptions. Notwithstanding the 22scheduling of xylazine as a Schedule III controlled substance, 23xylazine shall not be considered a controlled substance when:24    (1) used by licensed Illinois veterinarians dispensing or 25prescribing for, or administering to, a nonhuman species of a   HB0077- 13 -LRB104 03201 RLC 13222 b1drug containing xylazine that has been approved by the U.S. 2Food and Drug Administration;3    (2) used by licensed Illinois veterinarians dispensing or 4prescribing for, or administering to, a nonhuman species that 5is permissible under the Federal Food, Drug, and Cosmetic Act;6    (3) manufactured, distributed, or used as an active 7pharmaceutical ingredient for manufacturing an animal drug 8approved under the Federal Food, Drug, and Cosmetic Act;9    (4) used by a licensed certified euthanasia technician 10employed by a certified euthanasia agency; or11    (5) used by a wildlife biologist engaged in legal or 12authorized fieldwork under the indirect supervision of a 13veterinarian. 14    Section 95. No acceleration or delay. Where this Act makes 15changes in a statute that is represented in this Act by text 16that is not yet or no longer in effect (for example, a Section 17represented by multiple versions), the use of that text does 18not accelerate or delay the taking effect of (i) the changes 19made by this Act or (ii) provisions derived from any other 20Public Act.